Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-126
Sections, purpose.

Sections 52-125 to 52-159 creates, and provides for the attachment and enforceability of, a lien against real estate in favor of a person furnishing services or materials under a real estate improvement contract. Except as provided in sections 52-125 to 52-159, no nonconsensual lien arises against real estate by reason of improvements made thereon.

Laws 1981, LB 512, § 2.

The Nebraska Construction Lien Act does not take away a construction lienholder's common-law right to sue for breach of contract. Tilt-Up Concrete, Inc. v. Star City/Federal, Inc., 261 Neb. 64, 621 N.W.2d 502 (2001).